Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-871
Bridge commission; powers granted; how exercised.

Any commission may exercise the powers granted in sections 39-868 to 39-870 in the method provided in sections 39-860 to 39-870, or in any other method, in whole or in part, as provided in said sections.

Laws 1941, c. 78, § 2, p. 319;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2107;

R.S.1943, § 39-871.